Rhode Island, session 2025, SB945.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 37 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC PROPERTY AND WORKS"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 27
RHODE ISLAND ANTI-BID-RIGGING ACT
37-27-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Anti-Bid-Rigging Act.”
37-27-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) “Bid rigging” means an intentional and concerted activity of two (2) or more persons
to predetermine the winning bidder of a contract proposed, offered, or otherwise submitted for
competitive bidding by a government entity including, but not limited to, a contract proposed,
offered, or otherwise submitted for competitive bidding in violation of processes set forth pursuant
to law, regulation or ordinance including, but not limited to, procurement processes established
pursuant to chapter 2 of title 37 or chapter 55 of title 45, or regulations promulgated thereto:
(i) “Bid rigging” includes, but is not limited to, any one or more of the following:
(A) Price fixing;
(B) Submitting identical bids;
(C) Rotating bids;

(D) Sharing profits with a contractor who does not submit the low bid;
(E) Submitting prearranged bids, agreed-upon higher or lower bids or other complementary
bids;
(F) Dividing up territories to restrict competition; and/or
(G) Not submitting a bid;
(ii) Notwithstanding other provisions of this chapter, it is not unlawful for the same person
to simultaneously submit bids for the same work, or a portion thereof, as a proposed prime
contractor and subcontractor.
(2) “Debarment” means the exclusion from all state procurements and termination of
existing or outstanding contracts.
(3) “Person” means an individual or a firm, association, organization, business trust,
company, corporation, joint venture, partnership, proprietorship, or other business entity, whether
or not for profit, and any government or public entity.
(4) “Government entity” means any department, commission, council, board, bureau,
committee, institution, legislative body, agency, or government corporation of the executive,
legislative, or judicial branches of state, and/or local governments including, but not limited to,
those entities defined in § 37-2-7 relating to state governmental entities, public agencies, state
agencies, and governmental entities.
(5) “Prime contractor” means any person who has entered into a public contract.
37-27-3. Bid rigging prohibited.
It is unlawful for any person to knowingly conspire, collude, combine, or agree with
another to commit or attempt to commit bid rigging involving:
(1) A contract for the purchase of equipment, goods, services or materials or a contract for
construction or repair proposed, offered, or otherwise submitted by a government entity; or
(2) A subcontract for the purchase of equipment, goods, services or materials or for
construction or repair with a prime contractor or proposed prime contractor for a government entity.
37-27-4. Intentional interference with contract submission and award by public
official.
(a) It is unlawful for any person who is an official of or employed by any unit of state or
local government, or any public officers who are subject to the code of ethics set forth in § 36-14-
4, to knowingly and willfully convey, outside of any official procurement process adopted pursuant
to law, regulation or ordinance by that unit of government including, but not limited, to
procurement processes established pursuant to chapter 2 of title 37 or chapter 55 of title 45, or
regulations promulgated thereto, to any person any information concerning the specifications for
LC002535/SUB A - Page 2 of 5

such contract or the identity of any particular potential subcontractors, when conveyance of such
information concerning the specifications or contractors in the bid or offer is intended to improperly
influence acceptance of such bid or offer in contravention of the official procurement process. It
shall not constitute a violation of this subsection to convey information intended to clarify plans or
specifications regarding a public contract where such disclosure of information is also made
generally available to the public.
(b) It is unlawful for any person who is an official of or employed by any unit of state or
local government, or any public officers who are subject to the code of ethics set forth in § 36-14-
4, to knowingly and willfully take any action to deliberately and improperly influence the award in
favor of a particular bidder, prime contractor or subcontractor in contravention of official
procurement processes set forth pursuant to law, regulation or ordinance including, but not limited,
to procurement processes established pursuant to chapter 2 of title 37 or chapter 55 of title 45, or
regulations promulgated thereto, when such invitation to bid is required by law, regulation, or
ordinance.
37-27-5. Penalties.
(a) Unless otherwise specified, any violation of §§ 37-27-3 or 37-27-4 shall be deemed a
felony punishable by imprisonment not exceeding three (3) years and by a fine of up to one million
dollars ($1,000,000) or three (3) times the value of the submitted award or bid, whichever is greater.
Any criminal proceeding brought pursuant to this chapter must be commenced within three (3)
years after the alleged criminal act occurred.
(b) It shall not constitute a violation of this chapter when any person who is an official of
or employed by any unit of state or local government follows procedures established by federal,
state or local laws or regulations including, but not limited, to processes established pursuant to
chapter 2 of title 37 or chapter 55 of title 45, or regulations promulgated thereto.
(c) It shall not constitute a violation of this chapter for any person who is an official of or
employed by any unit of state or local government to provide to any person a copy of the transcript
or other summary of any pre-bid conference when such transcript or summary is also made
generally available to the public.
37-27-6. Debarment.
(a) Any vendor debarred pursuant to this chapter shall not perform work as a prime
contractor, consultant, subcontractor or subconsultant for the state and shall be excluded from all
state procurements and any contract between the state and the vendor shall be terminated.
(b) Any person who is found to be in violation of any provision of this chapter shall be
subject to debarment, pursuant to chapter 2 of title 37 or any regulations promulgated thereto, from
LC002535/SUB A - Page 3 of 5

state contracting for a period of up to five (5) years.
(c) A government entity that proposes, offers, or otherwise submits a contract for
competitive bidding shall maintain a current list of persons excluded or ineligible, by reason of
debarment, for participation in contracts or subcontracts with that government entity.
37-27-7. Severability.
Should any part of this chapter be declared invalid or unenforceable, or the enforcement or
compliance with it is suspended, restrained, or barred, either by the state or by the final judgment
of a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter shall remain in full force and
effect.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002535/SUB A
========
LC002535/SUB A - Page 4 of 5